test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-11katwq_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - katõq: # Noun (11) katõq 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     katõq+N+Sg+Nom: katõq
     katõq+N+Sg+Gen: kattõ
     katõq+N+Sg+Par: katõt
     katõq+N+Sg+Ill: kattõhe
     katõq+N+Sg+Ine: kattõn
     katõq+N+Sg+Ela: kattõst
     katõq+N+Sg+All: kattõlõ
     katõq+N+Sg+Ade: kattõl
     katõq+N+Sg+Abl: kattõlt
     katõq+N+Sg+Tra: kattõs
     katõq+N+Sg+Ter: kattõniq
     katõq+N+Sg+Abe: kattõldaq
     katõq+N+Sg+Com: kattõgaq
     katõq+N+Pl+Nom: kattõq
     katõq+N+Pl+Gen: kattidõ
     katõq+N+Pl+Par: kattit
     katõq+N+Pl+Ill: kattihe
     katõq+N+Pl+Ine: kattin
     katõq+N+Pl+Ela: kattist
     katõq+N+Pl+All: kattilõ
     katõq+N+Pl+Ade: kattil
     katõq+N+Pl+Abl: kattilt
     katõq+N+Pl+Tra: kattis
     katõq+N+Pl+Ter: kattiniq
     katõq+N+Pl+Abe: kattildaq
     katõq+N+Pl+Com: kattidõgaq
